Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

30-10-101. Offices - inspection of records - failure to comply - penalty.

Every sheriff, county clerk and recorder, and county treasurer shall keep his or her respective office at the county seat of the county and in the office provided by the county, if any such has been provided, or, if there is none provided, then at such place as the board of county commissioners shall direct. Subject to the provisions of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., and any judicially recognized right of privacy, all books and papers required to be in such offices shall be open to the examination of any person, but no person, except parties in interest, or their attorneys, shall have the right to examine pleadings or other papers filed in any cause pending in such court.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the sheriff, county clerk and recorder, county treasurer, and clerk of the district and county courts may maintain his or her office at a location other than the county seat when authorized to do so pursuant to part 1 of article 5 of title 13, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the sheriff, county clerk and recorder, and county treasurer may keep one or more offices outside of the county seat or such other place authorized pursuant to part 1 of article 5 of title 13, C.R.S. Any such office shall be in addition to his or her respective office kept pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) and shall be within the same county. Any such additional office may be kept only if the board of county commissioners of such county makes office space or funding available to provide for the office.

As used in this section, "office" shall mean a place where some or all of the duties of a sheriff, county clerk and recorder, county treasurer, or clerk of the district and county courts are conducted.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2.5) of this section, any person or corporation and their employees engaged in making abstracts or abstract books or in the business of title insurance, as defined in section 10-11-102 (3), C.R.S., shall have the right, during usual business hours and subject to such rules and regulations as the officer having the custody of such records may prescribe, to inspect and make memoranda, copies, or photographs of the contents of all such books and papers for the purpose of their business; but any such officer may make reasonable and general regulations concerning the inspection of such books and papers by the public or by such abstractors or title insurance personnel. If, for the purpose of making such copies, it becomes necessary to remove such records from the room where they are usually kept to some other room in the courthouse where such copying apparatus may be installed for such purpose, the county clerk and recorder, in his or her discretion, may charge to the person or corporation making such copies a fee of ten dollars per hour for the service of the deputy who has charge of such records while they are being so copied; but such fees shall not be charged to one person or corporation unless the same fee is likewise charged to every person or corporation copying such records.

(2.5) (a) In lieu of affording the right of inspection and copying set forth in subsection (2) of this section, any clerk and recorder may make available to abstractors, title insurance personnel, and others, by subscription and on such medium as the clerk and recorder shall determine in accordance with the provisions of section 30-10-407, a daily copy in bulk of all documents recorded and filed in such office or less than all if the clerk and recorder determines it to be feasible to sort the bulk as requested. Such bulk copy shall be available to the subscriber no later than the third business day following the date of recording or filing. The fee to be charged by the clerk and recorder for bulk copies supplied in accordance with this subsection (2.5) shall be sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of production incurred by the clerk and recorder.

Upon tender of the appropriate fee as provided in section 30-1-103 (2)(j), the clerk and recorder shall furnish single copies of documents upon demand.

The clerk and recorder shall not be required to conduct a search of the real estate records in order to locate any document for copying or for any other purpose.

If any person or officer refuses or neglects to comply with the provisions of this section, he shall forfeit for each day he so refuses or neglects the sum of five dollars, to be collected by civil action, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado, and pay it into the school fund; but this shall not interfere with or take away any right of action for damages by any person injured by such neglect or refusal.

Source:

G.L.

§ 554.

L. 1885:

p. 157, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1352.

L. 13:

p. 227, § 1.

L. 19:

p. 368, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8829.

CSA:

C. 45, § 176.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1435, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1226, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 709, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 91, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1556, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) added, p. 652, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 556, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

(2.5)(a) amended, (HB 14-1073), ch. 30, p. 176, § 4, effective July 1.

30-10-102. All money delivered to treasurer - penalty for failure.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every county clerk and recorder, district attorney, sheriff, or other state or county officer appointed by law, required or permitted to receive and pay over to the county treasurer any taxes, fines, fees, or other moneys whatsoever, within thirty days after the receipt of such moneys, shall pay the same over to the county treasurer, and together therewith such officer so paying over the same shall deliver to the county treasurer a statement of the amount of such moneys so collected by him and paid over, which statement shall be signed by the person paying the same, sworn to before the county treasurer, and then filed and preserved in the office of such treasurer. Every person falsely swearing in any such statement is guilty of perjury in the second degree. The county treasurer shall not demand or receive any fee for administering the oath required by this section.

Fines and fees levied and collected in state courts for which no specific disposition is provided shall be paid to the department of the treasury for deposit in the general fund.

Source:

G.L.

§ 558.

G.S.

§ 658.

R.S. 08:

§ 1356.

C.L.

§ 8833.

CSA:

C. 45, § 180.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-2.

L. 64:

p. 221, § 46.

L. 72:

p. 556, § 9.

L. 73:

p. 1401, § 24.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 556, § 2, effective August 11.

30-10-103. Copies prima facie evidence.

Copies of all documents, writs, proceedings, instruments, papers, and writings duly filed or deposited in the office of any county judge, county clerk and recorder, or county treasurer, and transcripts from books of record or proceedings kept by any of said officers, with the seal of his office affixed, shall be prima facie evidence in all cases.

Source:

G.L.

§ 559.

G.S.

§ 659.

R.S. 08:

§ 1357.

C.L.

§ 8834.

CSA:

C. 45, § 181.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-3.

30-10-104. Resignations of officers, to whom made.

All county officers who hold their office by election shall make their resignation to the officer authorized by law to fill such vacancies in such office, respectively.

Source:

G.L.

§ 560.

G.S.

§ 660.

R.S. 08:

§ 1358.

C.L.

§ 8835.

CSA:

C. 45, § 182.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-4.

30-10-105. When office becomes vacant.

Every county office shall become vacant, on the happening of any one of the following events, before the expiration of the term of office:

The death of the incumbent;

The resignation of the incumbent;

The removal of the incumbent;

The incumbent's ceasing to be an inhabitant of the county for which he was elected or appointed;

The incumbent's refusal or neglect to take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101, to give or renew his or her official bond, or to deposit such bond within the time prescribed by law;

The decision of a competent tribunal declaring void his election or appointment;

The incumbent is declared incapacitated in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Repealed.

In the event a county officer is found guilty of any felony or infamous crime by a court or jury, the board of county commissioners shall immediately suspend such county officer from office without pay until his conviction is final and he has exhausted, or by failure to assert them has waived, all rights to new trial and all rights of appeal. At the time such officer's conviction is final and he has exhausted, or by failure to assert them has waived, all rights to appeal and new trial, the said board shall remove such officer from office and his successor shall be appointed as provided by statute, unless during such period of suspension a successor has been duly elected and qualified and said successor, whether so appointed or elected, shall be the duly constituted officer.

Should the officer suspended from office by the board of county commissioners as provided in this section be found not guilty in a state or federal court either on appeal, original trial, or new trial, the board shall forthwith reinstate such officer and give him his back pay, unless during such period of suspension a successor to such suspended officer has been duly elected and qualified. In the event a successor to such suspended officer has been so elected and qualified, such suspended officer shall receive his back pay only up to the expiration date of his regular term of office and he shall not be reinstated or paid further unless he is such person duly elected and qualified.

Any county officer shall be declared incapacitated when there is a judicial determination that he is unable to routinely and fully carry out the responsibilities of his office by virtue of mental or physical illness or disability and he has been so unable for a continuous period of not less than six months immediately preceding the finding of incapacity. The quantum of proof required, the procedures to be followed, and the rights reserved to the subject of any determination of incapacity under this subsection (4) shall be those specified for the appointment of guardians in part 3 of article 14 of title 15, C.R.S., to the extent applicable.

A proceeding to determine incapacity under this subsection (4) shall be commenced in the district court by a majority of the board of county commissioners. With respect to a county commissioner, proceedings shall be commenced when said commissioner fails to attend any regular meeting of the board of county commissioners for a period of six months. With respect to any county officer other than a county commissioner, proceedings shall be commenced when such officer fails to report to his office or other regular place of business for a period of six months.

In any county having a population of less than one hundred thousand, the county shall be represented in the district court by the district attorney or by a qualified attorney acting for the district attorney who is appointed by the district court for that purpose. In any county having a population of one hundred thousand or more, the county shall be represented by the county attorney or a qualified attorney acting for the county attorney who is appointed by the district court for that purpose.

Source:

G.L.

§ 561.

G.S.

§ 661.

R.S. 08:

§ 1359.

C.L.

§ 8836.

CSA:

C. 45, § 183.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-5.

L. 57:

p. 308, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-5.

L. 89:

(1)(g) and (4) added, p. 1277, §§ 1, 2, effective March 9.

L. 90:

(1)(h) added, p. 1445, § 2, effective April 5; (1)(h) repealed, p. 1847, § 43, effective May 31.

L. 2000:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1835, § 15, effective January 1, 2001.

L. 2018:

(1)(e) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 696, § 20, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-106. Substitute officers have same powers and compensation.

When any coroner is required to act as sheriff, or any other officer in this state is required to perform any duties belonging to any other office, for the time being, he shall have the same powers in respect to that duty as are given by law to the officer whose duties he performs, and shall be entitled to receive the same compensation for his services.

Source:

G.L.

§ 562.

G.S.

§ 662.

R.S. 08:

§ 1360.

C.L.

§ 8837.

CSA:

C. 45, § 184.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-6.

L. 64:

p. 221, § 47.

30-10-107. Penalty for refusing to qualify.

Any person elected or appointed to any county office in any county in this state who refuses to qualify, having consented to such election or appointment, is liable to a fine not exceeding one hundred nor less than twenty-five dollars, at the discretion of any court having competent jurisdiction.

Source:

R.S.

p. 190, § 1.

G.L.

§ 564.

G.S.

§ 664.

R.S. 08:

§ 1361.

C.L.

§ 8838.

CSA:

C. 45, § 185.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-7.

30-10-108. Fines appropriated to school fund of county.

All fines contemplated in section 30-10-107 shall be recoverable before any court in this state, in the name of the county in which the case arises, and shall be appropriated to the use of the school fund of said county.

Source:

R.S.

p. 190, § 10.

G.L.

§ 564.

G.S.

§ 665.

R.S. 08:

§ 1362.

C.L.

§ 8839.

CSA:

C. 45, § 186.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-8.

30-10-109. Office hours.

All county offices shall be kept open for the transaction of county business on the days and during the hours designated by resolution of the board of county commissioners. However, all clerks of court and sheriffs shall be subject, at all times, to the command of the people, and each thereof shall at all hours, night and day, be prepared to attend such duties as may reasonably be required of them.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 304, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 187(1).

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-9.

L. 55:

p. 248, § 1.

L. 59:

p. 344, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-9.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1436, § 1, effective May 26.

30-10-110. Bonds or insurance of officers - oath or affirmation.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every county officer named in section 30-10-101, before entering upon the duties of office, on or before the day of the commencement of the term for which the officer was elected, shall execute and deposit an official bond, as prescribed by law. Any such officer shall also take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of the county officer and county employees to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the officer while in office or employees.

Source:

G.L.

§ 555.

G.S.

§ 668.

R.S. 08:

§ 1353.

C.L.

§ 8830.

CSA:

C. 45, § 177.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-10.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 557, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 696, § 21, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For oath of office, see §§ 8 and 9 of art. XII, Colo. Const.; for approval and execution of bonds, see §§ 10-4-301 and 24-13-116.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-111. Oath of deputy.

A deputy appointed to office, before entering upon the deputy's duties under such appointment, shall take and subscribe the like oath of office as that required to be taken by the appointing officer and shall deposit the same in the office where the oath of such officer is deposited.

Source:

G.L.

§ 556.

G.S.

§ 669.

R.S. 08:

§ 1354.

C.L.

§ 8831.

CSA:

C. 45, § 178.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-11.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 557, § 4, effective August 11.

30-10-112. Officer to act until successor qualifies.

When the term of office of any sheriff, coroner, county judge, county clerk and recorder, assessor, county treasurer, county surveyor, or other county officer expires, it shall be lawful for such officer, whether reelected or not, and his deputies, to continue to perform all the duties of such office until his successor is duly qualified as required by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 557.

G.S.

§ 657.

R.S. 08:

§ 1355.

C.L.

§ 8832.

CSA:

C. 45, § 179.

CRS 53:

§ 35-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-12.

L. 64:

p. 222, § 48.

30-10-113. Contribution limits for county offices - definitions.

The maximum amount of aggregate contributions that a person may make to a candidate committee of a candidate for a county office and that a candidate committee for such candidate may accept from such person and related requirements governing the disclosure of such contributions are specified in section 1-45-103.7 (1.5).

For purposes of this section:

"County office" means a county commissioner, county clerk and recorder, sheriff, coroner, treasurer, assessor, or surveyor.

"Person" has the same meaning as specified in section 2 (11) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1007), ch. 97, p. 357, § 2, effective August 2.